Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.226

Director—Licensing rules and interim procedures.

For the purposes of implementing an orderly and efficient licensing process, the director may establish licensing rules and interim procedures for licensing and acceptance of applications. For previously registered or licensed individuals, the director may establish expedited review and licensing procedures.

[ 2009 c 528 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective date—License requirement—Implementation—2009 c 528: See notes following RCW 19.146.010.